test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_laigu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - láigu: # ok LAIGU
    láigu+N+Sg+Nom:  láigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Gen:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Acc:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Ill:  lááigun
    láigu+N+Sg+Loc:  lááigust
    láigu+N+Sg+Com:  láigoin
    láigu+N+Sg+Abe:  láiguttáá
    láigu+N+Ess:  láigun
    láigu+N+Par:  láigud
    láigu+N+Pl+Nom:  lááiguh
    láigu+N+Pl+Gen: [lááigui, láigui]
    láigu+N+Pl+Acc:  lááiguid
    láigu+N+Pl+Ill:  láigoid
    láigu+N+Pl+Loc:  lááiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Com:  láiguiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Abe:  láiguittáá

  Noun - sáigu: # ok LAIGU
    sáigu+N+Sg+Nom:  sáigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Gen:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Acc:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Ill:  sááigun
    sáigu+N+Sg+Loc:  sááigust
    sáigu+N+Sg+Com:  sáigoin
    sáigu+N+Sg+Abe:  sáiguttáá
    sáigu+N+Ess:  sáigun
    sáigu+N+Par:  sáigud
    sáigu+N+Pl+Nom:  sááiguh
    sáigu+N+Pl+Gen: [sááigui, sáigui]
    sáigu+N+Pl+Acc:  sááiguid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Ill:  sáigoid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Loc:  sááiguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Com:  sáiguiguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Abe:  sáiguittáá

  Noun - áimu: # ok LAIGU
    áimu+N+Sg+Nom:  áimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááimun
    áimu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááimust
    áimu+N+Sg+Com:  áimoin
    áimu+N+Sg+Abe:  áimuttáá
    áimu+N+Ess:  áimun
    áimu+N+Par:  áimud
    áimu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááimuh
    áimu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááimui, áimui]
    áimu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááimuid
    áimu+N+Pl+Ill:  áimoid
    áimu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááimuin
    áimu+N+Pl+Com:  áimuiguin
    áimu+N+Pl+Abe:  áimuittáá


  Noun - váimu: # ok LAIGU
    váimu+N+Sg+Nom:  váimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Gen:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Acc:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Ill:  vááimun
    váimu+N+Sg+Loc:  vááimust
    váimu+N+Sg+Com:  váimoin
    váimu+N+Sg+Abe:  váimuttáá
    váimu+N+Ess:  váimun
    váimu+N+Par:  váimud
    váimu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááimuh
    váimu+N+Pl+Gen: [vááimui, váimui]
    váimu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááimuid
    váimu+N+Pl+Ill:  váimoid
    váimu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááimuin
    váimu+N+Pl+Com:  váimuiguin
    váimu+N+Pl+Abe:  váimuittáá

  Noun - áiru: # ok LAIGU
    áiru+N+Sg+Nom:  áiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Gen:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Acc:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Ill:  ááirun
    áiru+N+Sg+Loc:  ááirust
    áiru+N+Sg+Com:  áiroin
    áiru+N+Sg+Abe:  áiruttáá
    áiru+N+Ess:  áirun
    áiru+N+Par:  áirud
    áiru+N+Pl+Nom:  ááiruh
    áiru+N+Pl+Gen: [ááirui, áirui]
    áiru+N+Pl+Acc:  ááiruid
    áiru+N+Pl+Ill:  áiroid
    áiru+N+Pl+Loc:  ááiruin
    áiru+N+Pl+Com:  áiruiguin
    áiru+N+Pl+Abe:  áiruittáá

  Noun - káivu: # OK LAIGU
    káivu+N+Sg+Nom:  káivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Acc:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááivun
    káivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááivust
    káivu+N+Sg+Com:  káivoin
    káivu+N+Sg+Abe:  káivuttáá
    káivu+N+Ess:  káivun
    káivu+N+Par:  káivud
    káivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááivuh
    káivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááivui, káivui]
    káivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááivuid
    káivu+N+Pl+Ill:  káivoid
    káivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááivuin
    káivu+N+Pl+Com:  káivuiguin
    káivu+N+Pl+Abe:  káivuittáá

  Noun - tárbu: #ok LAIGU
    tárbu+N+Sg+Nom:  tárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Gen:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Acc:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Ill:  táárbun
    tárbu+N+Sg+Loc:  táárbust
    tárbu+N+Sg+Com:  tárboin
    tárbu+N+Sg+Abe:  tárbuttáá
    tárbu+N+Ess:  tárbun
    tárbu+N+Par:  tárbud
    tárbu+N+Pl+Nom:  táárbuh
    tárbu+N+Pl+Gen: [táárbui, tárbui]
    tárbu+N+Pl+Acc:  táárbuid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Ill:  tárboid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Loc:  táárbuin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Com:  tárbuiguin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Abe:  tárbuittáá

  Noun - áldu: # ok LAIGU
    áldu+N+Sg+Nom:  áldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááldun
    áldu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááldust
    áldu+N+Sg+Com:  áldoin
    áldu+N+Sg+Abe:  álduttáá
    áldu+N+Ess:  áldun
    áldu+N+Par:  áldud
    áldu+N+Pl+Nom:  áálduh
    áldu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááldui, áldui]
    áldu+N+Pl+Acc:  áálduid
    áldu+N+Pl+Ill:  áldoid
    áldu+N+Pl+Loc:  áálduin
    áldu+N+Pl+Com:  álduiguin
    áldu+N+Pl+Abe:  álduittáá

  Noun - rávdu: # ok LAIGU
    rávdu+N+Sg+Nom:  rávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávdun
    rávdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávdust
    rávdu+N+Sg+Com:  rávdoin
    rávdu+N+Sg+Abe:  rávduttáá
    rávdu+N+Ess:  rávdun
    rávdu+N+Par:  rávdud
    rávdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávduh
    rávdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávdui, rávdui]
    rávdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávduid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávdoid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávduin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Com:  rávduiguin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Abe:  rávduittáá

  Noun - kálgu: # ok LAIGU
    kálgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálgu
    kálgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálgun
    kálgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálgust
    kálgu+N+Sg+Com:  kálgoin
    kálgu+N+Sg+Abe:  kálguttáá
    kálgu+N+Ess:  kálgun
    kálgu+N+Par:  kálgud
    kálgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálguh
    kálgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálgui, kálgui]
    kálgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálguid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálgoid
    kálgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Com:  kálguiguin
    kálgu+N+Pl+Abe:  kálguittáá

  Noun - kárgu: # ok LAIGU
    kárgu+N+Sg+Nom:  kárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Gen:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Acc:  káárgu
    kárgu+N+Sg+Ill:  káárgun
    kárgu+N+Sg+Loc:  káárgust
    kárgu+N+Sg+Com:  kárgoin
    kárgu+N+Sg+Abe:  kárguttáá
    kárgu+N+Ess:  kárgun
    kárgu+N+Par:  kárgud
    kárgu+N+Pl+Nom:  káárguh
    kárgu+N+Pl+Gen: [káárgui, kárgui]
    kárgu+N+Pl+Acc:  káárguid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Ill:  kárgoid
    kárgu+N+Pl+Loc:  káárguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Com:  kárguiguin
    kárgu+N+Pl+Abe:  kárguittáá


  Noun - ármu: # ok LAIGU
    ármu+N+Sg+Nom:  ármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Gen:  áármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Acc:  áármu
    ármu+N+Sg+Ill:  áármun
    ármu+N+Sg+Loc:  áármust
    ármu+N+Sg+Com:  ármoin
    ármu+N+Sg+Abe:  ármuttáá
    ármu+N+Ess:  ármun
    ármu+N+Par:  ármud
    ármu+N+Pl+Nom:  áármuh
    ármu+N+Pl+Gen: [áármui, ármui]
    ármu+N+Pl+Acc:  áármuid
    ármu+N+Pl+Ill:  ármoid
    ármu+N+Pl+Loc:  áármuin
    ármu+N+Pl+Com:  ármuiguin
    ármu+N+Pl+Abe:  ármuittáá


  Noun - vávnu: # ok LAIGU
    vávnu+N+Sg+Nom:  vávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Gen:  váávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Acc:  váávnu
    vávnu+N+Sg+Ill:  váávnun
    vávnu+N+Sg+Loc:  váávnust
    vávnu+N+Sg+Com:  vávnoin
    vávnu+N+Sg+Abe:  vávnuttáá
    vávnu+N+Ess:  vávnun
    vávnu+N+Par:  vávnud
    vávnu+N+Pl+Nom:  váávnuh
    vávnu+N+Pl+Gen: [váávnui, vávnui]
    vávnu+N+Pl+Acc:  váávnuid
    vávnu+N+Pl+Ill:  vávnoid
    vávnu+N+Pl+Loc:  váávnuin
    vávnu+N+Pl+Com:  vávnuiguin
    vávnu+N+Pl+Abe:  vávnuittáá

  Noun - áptu: # ok LAIGU
    áptu+N+Sg+Nom:  áptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááptu
    áptu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááptun
    áptu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááptust
    áptu+N+Sg+Com:  áptoin
    áptu+N+Sg+Abe:  áptuttáá
    áptu+N+Ess:  áptun
    áptu+N+Par:  áptud
    áptu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááptuh
    áptu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááptui, áptui]
    áptu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááptuid
    áptu+N+Pl+Ill:  áptoid
    áptu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááptuin
    áptu+N+Pl+Com:  áptuiguin
    áptu+N+Pl+Abe:  áptuittáá

  Noun - vástu: # ok LAIGU
    vástu+N+Sg+Nom:  vástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Gen:  váástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Acc:  váástu
    vástu+N+Sg+Ill:  váástun
    vástu+N+Sg+Loc:  váástust
    vástu+N+Sg+Com:  vástoin
    vástu+N+Sg+Abe:  vástuttáá
    vástu+N+Ess:  vástun
    vástu+N+Par:  vástud
    vástu+N+Pl+Nom:  váástuh
    vástu+N+Pl+Gen: [váástui, vástui]
    vástu+N+Pl+Acc:  váástuid
    vástu+N+Pl+Ill:  vástoid
    vástu+N+Pl+Loc:  váástuin
    vástu+N+Pl+Com:  vástuiguin
    vástu+N+Pl+Abe:  vástuittáá


  Noun - kálvu: # ok LAIGU
    kálvu+N+Sg+Nom:  kálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Gen:  káálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Acc:  káálvu
    kálvu+N+Sg+Ill:  káálvun
    kálvu+N+Sg+Loc:  káálvust
    kálvu+N+Sg+Com:  kálvoin
    kálvu+N+Sg+Abe:  kálvuttáá
    kálvu+N+Ess:  kálvun
    kálvu+N+Par:  kálvud
    kálvu+N+Pl+Nom:  káálvuh
    kálvu+N+Pl+Gen: [káálvui, kálvui]
    kálvu+N+Pl+Acc:  káálvuid
    kálvu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálvoid
    kálvu+N+Pl+Loc:  káálvuin
    kálvu+N+Pl+Com:  kálvuiguin
    kálvu+N+Pl+Abe:  kálvuittáá

  Noun - árvu: # ok LAIGU
    árvu+N+Sg+Nom:  árvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Acc:  áárvu
    árvu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárvun
    árvu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárvust
    árvu+N+Sg+Com:  árvoin
    árvu+N+Sg+Abe:  árvuttáá
    árvu+N+Ess:  árvun
    árvu+N+Par:  árvud
    árvu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárvuh
    árvu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárvui, árvui]
    árvu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárvuid
    árvu+N+Pl+Ill:  árvoid
    árvu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárvuin
    árvu+N+Pl+Com:  árvuiguin
    árvu+N+Pl+Abe:  árvuittáá

  Noun - várvu: # ok LAIGU
    várvu+N+Sg+Nom:  várvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Gen:  váárvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Acc:  váárvu
    várvu+N+Sg+Ill:  váárvun
    várvu+N+Sg+Loc:  váárvust
    várvu+N+Sg+Com:  várvoin
    várvu+N+Sg+Abe:  várvuttáá
    várvu+N+Ess:  várvun
    várvu+N+Par:  várvud
    várvu+N+Pl+Nom:  váárvuh
    várvu+N+Pl+Gen: [váárvui, várvui]
    várvu+N+Pl+Acc:  váárvuid
    várvu+N+Pl+Ill:  várvoid
    várvu+N+Pl+Loc:  váárvuin
    várvu+N+Pl+Com:  várvuiguin
    várvu+N+Pl+Abe:  várvuittáá

  Noun - ákšu: # ok LAIGU
    ákšu+N+Sg+Nom:  ákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Gen:  áákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Acc:  áákšu
    ákšu+N+Sg+Ill:  áákšun
    ákšu+N+Sg+Loc:  áákšust
    ákšu+N+Sg+Com:  ákšoin
    ákšu+N+Sg+Abe:  ákšuttáá
    ákšu+N+Ess:  ákšun
    ákšu+N+Par:  ákšud
    ákšu+N+Pl+Nom:  áákšuh
    ákšu+N+Pl+Gen: [áákšui, ákšui]
    ákšu+N+Pl+Acc:  áákšuid
    ákšu+N+Pl+Ill:  ákšoid
    ákšu+N+Pl+Loc:  áákšuin
    ákšu+N+Pl+Com:  ákšuiguin
    ákšu+N+Pl+Abe:  ákšuittáá

  Noun - skálžu: # ok LAIGU
    skálžu+N+Sg+Nom:  skálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Gen:  skáálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Acc:  skáálžu
    skálžu+N+Sg+Ill:  skáálžun
    skálžu+N+Sg+Loc:  skáálžust
    skálžu+N+Sg+Com:  skálžoin
    skálžu+N+Sg+Abe:  skálžuttáá
    skálžu+N+Ess:  skálžun
    skálžu+N+Par:  skálžud
    skálžu+N+Pl+Nom:  skáálžuh
    skálžu+N+Pl+Gen: [skáálžui, skálžui]
    skálžu+N+Pl+Acc:  skáálžuid
    skálžu+N+Pl+Ill:  skálžoid
    skálžu+N+Pl+Loc:  skáálžuin
    skálžu+N+Pl+Com:  skálžuiguin
    skálžu+N+Pl+Abe:  skálžuittáá

  Noun - ráiđu: # ok LAIGU
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Nom:  ráiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Gen:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Acc:  rááiđu
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Ill:  rááiđun
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Loc:  rááiđust
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Com:  ráiđoin
    ráiđu+N+Sg+Abe:  ráiđuttáá
    ráiđu+N+Ess:  ráiđun
    ráiđu+N+Par:  ráiđud
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Nom:  rááiđuh
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Gen: [rááiđui, ráiđui]
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Acc:  rááiđuid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Ill:  ráiđoid
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Loc:  rááiđuin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Com:  ráiđuiguin
    ráiđu+N+Pl+Abe:  ráiđuittáá

  Noun - ávju: # ok LAIGU
    ávju+N+Sg+Nom:  ávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Gen:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Acc:  áávju
    ávju+N+Sg+Ill:  áávjun
    ávju+N+Sg+Loc:  áávjust
    ávju+N+Sg+Com:  ávjoin
    ávju+N+Sg+Abe:  ávjuttáá
    ávju+N+Ess:  ávjun
    ávju+N+Par:  ávjud
    ávju+N+Pl+Nom:  áávjuh
    ávju+N+Pl+Gen: [áávjui, ávjui]
    ávju+N+Pl+Acc:  áávjuid
    ávju+N+Pl+Ill:  ávjoid
    ávju+N+Pl+Loc:  áávjuin
    ávju+N+Pl+Com:  ávjuiguin
    ávju+N+Pl+Abe:  ávjuittáá

  Noun - sátku: # ok LAIGU
    sátku+N+Sg+Nom:  sátku
    sátku+N+Sg+Gen:  sááđhu
    sátku+N+Sg+Acc:  sááđhu
    sátku+N+Sg+Ill:  sáátkun
    sátku+N+Sg+Loc:  sááđhust
    sátku+N+Sg+Com:  sáđhoin
    sátku+N+Sg+Abe:  sáđhuttáá
    sátku+N+Ess:  sátkun
    sátku+N+Par:  sátkud
    sátku+N+Pl+Nom:  sááđhuh
    sátku+N+Pl+Gen: [sááđhui, sáđhui]
    sátku+N+Pl+Acc:  sááđhuid
    sátku+N+Pl+Ill:  sáđhoid
    sátku+N+Pl+Loc:  sááđhuin
    sátku+N+Pl+Com:  sáđhuiguin
    sátku+N+Pl+Abe:  sáđhuittáá

  Noun - rášku: # ok LAIGU
    rášku+N+Sg+Nom:  rášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Ill:  rááškun
    rášku+N+Sg+Loc:  rááškust
    rášku+N+Sg+Com:  ráškoin
    rášku+N+Sg+Abe:  ráškuttáá
    rášku+N+Ess:  ráškun
    rášku+N+Par:  ráškud
    rášku+N+Pl+Nom:  rááškuh
    rášku+N+Pl+Gen: [rááškui, ráškui]
    rášku+N+Pl+Acc:  rááškuid
    rášku+N+Pl+Ill:  ráškoid
    rášku+N+Pl+Loc:  rááškuin
    rášku+N+Pl+Com:  ráškuiguin
    rášku+N+Pl+Abe:  ráškuittáá
